Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2170.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. The first full week of February shall be designated as
"Kansas burn awareness week" to accomplish all of the following:
(a) Commemorate a week of remembrance for all who have lost their
lives or have been injured as a result of a burn;
(b) raise awareness for the seriousness of accidental burn injuries and
fatalities in this state; and
(c) educate the public on effective preventative measures to avoid
accidental burn injuries or fatalities.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.